Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of ORS 291.055 (1)(e), a li-
censing system fee of $10, adopted  by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission and
approved by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, is approved.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by House June 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5043 (HB 5043-A) Page 1